src/fst/guesser.lexc
! The Kleene star operation on top of the resulting transducer will yield the complete vocabulary, incl. compound words.
 

LEXICON Root !!= * {{@CODE@}} is the starting point of everything

@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@@P.POS.NProp@@U.Cap.Obl@   GuessName "weight: 50" ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}
!@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@@P.POS.NProp@@U.Cap.Opt@   GuessName ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}
!@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@   GuessDerivation "weight: 35" ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}
@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@@P.POS.N@   GuessSimplexNoun "weight: 70" ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}
! notice @P.Part.One@; this is what finite verb form affixes require
@D.Part@@P.Part.One@@P.POS.V@   GuessVerb "weight: 70" ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}

! blahblah that might be followed by a word; a desperate attempt at guessing:
! @U.Cap.Obl@ is used as a flag (in a filter) to upcase the name string

@D.Part@@P.Part.Two@@P.NeedPartThree.On@@P.POS.Guess@@P.Stem.Guessed@@U.Cap.Obl@ SomeThingName ;         
@D.Part@@P.Part.Two@@P.NeedPartThree.On@@P.POS.Guess@@P.Stem.Guessed@ SomeThing ;        

   
LEXICON SomeThingName

!  < [~Name & ~Word & [AnySymbol* AnySymbol AnySymbol]] 0:%- "+Guess":0 > # ;
  < [Letter* Letter Letter] 0:%- "+Guess":0 "+N":0 "+Prop":0 > # ;

LEXICON SomeThing
  < [Letter* Letter Letter] 0:» "+Guess":0 > # ;     ! » blocks insertion of a surface hyphen (elsewhere)

LEXICON GuessName

  < [NimiARMEE] > GuessNameARMEE ;
  < [NimiAASTA] > GuessNameAASTA ;
  < [NimiPERE] > GuessNamePERE ;
  < [NimiOLULINE] > GuessNameOLULINE ;
  < [NimiSOOLANE] > GuessNameSOOLANE ;
  < [NimiOLULIS] > GuessNameOLULIS ;
  < [NimiSOOLAS] > GuessNameSOOLAS ;
  < [NimiMUUSEUM] > GuessNameMUUSEUM ;
  < [NimiELANIK] > GuessNameELANIK ;
  < [NimiVIRSIK] > GuessNameVIRSIK ;
  < [NimiKABINET] > GuessNameKABINET ;
  < [NimiMAGUS] > GuessNameMAGUS ;
  < [NimiREDEL] > GuessNameREDEL ;
  < [NimiTAUD] > GuessNameTAUD ;
  < [ProtoKOND] d:"D1"> GuessNameKOND ; ! ?? kas on ikka vaja?
  < [ProtoAPO] 0:%{apo%}> GuessNameAPO ; 

LEXICON GuessSimplexNoun

  < [ProtoARMEE] > GuessARMEE ;
  < [ProtoKAVA] > GuessKAVA ;
  < [ProtoAASTA] > GuessAASTA ;
  < [ProtoPERE]  > GuessPERE ;
  < [ProtoPEENIKE] > GuessPEENIKE ;
  < [ProtoOLULINE & ~[[Letter* DerLane] | [Letter* DerMine]]] > GuessOLULINE ; ! adjectives
  < [ProtoOLULINE &  [[Letter* DerLane] | [Letter* DerMine]]] > GuessOLULIS ;  ! nouns
  < [ProtoSOOLANE] > GuessSOOLANE ;
  < [ProtoSOOLANE &  [Letter* DerLane]] > GuessMAALANE ;
  < [ProtoOLULIS] > GuessOLULIS ;
  < [ProtoSOOLAS] > GuessSOOLAS ;
  < [ProtoMUUSEUM] > GuessMUUSEUM ;
  < [ProtoELANIK] > GuessELANIK ;
  < [ProtoELANIK & [Letter* lL iI kK]] > GuessLIK ;
  < [ProtoVIRSIK] > GuessVIRSIK ;
  < [ProtoKABINET] > GuessKABINET ;
  < [ProtoMAGUS] > GuessMAGUS ;
  < [ProtoLOHAKAS] > GuessLOHAKAS ;
  < [ProtoREDEL] > GuessREDEL ;
  < [ProtoTAUD] > GuessTAUD ;
  < [ProtoKOND] d:"D1"> GuessKOND ;

LEXICON GuessVerb

  < [RABELEMA] > GuessRABELEMA ;
  < [HAKKAMA] > GuessHAKKAMA ;
  < [LEPPIMA] > GuessLEPPIMA ;
  < [ELAMA] > GuessELAMA ;

LEXICON GuessLane   
    +Guess: LANE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessLine   
    +Guess: LINE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessMine   
    +Guess: MINE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessNe   
    +Guess: NE_DERIVATION_SUF ;

!LEXICON GuessUs   
!    +Guess: US_DERIVATION_SUF ;

LEXICON GuessOluline
    +Guess+A: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessOlulane   
    +Guess+N: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessARMEE
   +Guess+N: ARMEE ;

LEXICON GuessNameARMEE
   +Guess+N+Prop: ARMEE ;

LEXICON GuessKAVA
   +Guess+N: KAVA ;

LEXICON GuessNameKAVA
   +Guess+N+Prop: KAVA ;

LEXICON GuessAASTA
   +Guess+N: AASTA ;

LEXICON GuessNameAASTA
   +Guess+N+Prop: AASTA ;

LEXICON GuessPERE
   +Guess+N: PERE ;

LEXICON GuessNamePERE
   +Guess+N+Prop: PERE ;

LEXICON GuessPEENIKE
   +Guess+N: PEENIKE ;
   +Guess+A: PEENIKE ;

LEXICON GuessOLULINE
   +Guess+A: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessNameOLULINE
   +Guess+N+Prop: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessSOOLANE
   +Guess+A: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessMAALANE
   +Guess+N: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessNameSOOLANE
   +Guess+N+Prop: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessOLULIS
   +Guess+N: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessNameOLULIS
   +Guess+N+Prop: OLULINE ;

LEXICON GuessSOOLAS
   +Guess+N: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessNameSOOLAS
   +Guess+N+Prop: SOOLANE ;

LEXICON GuessMUUSEUM
   +Guess+N: MUUSEUM ;

LEXICON GuessNameMUUSEUM
   +Guess+N+Prop: MUUSEUM ;

LEXICON GuessELANIK
   +Guess+N: ELANIK ;

LEXICON GuessLIK
   +Guess+A: ELANIK ;

LEXICON GuessNameELANIK
   +Guess+N+Prop: ELANIK ;

LEXICON GuessVIRSIK
   +Guess+N: VIRSIK ;

LEXICON GuessNameVIRSIK
   +Guess+N+Prop: VIRSIK ;

LEXICON GuessKABINET
   +Guess+N: KABINET ;

LEXICON GuessNameKABINET
   +Guess+N+Prop: KABINET ;
   +Guess+N+Prop: FIAT ;   ! ?? no change in orthography

LEXICON GuessMAGUS
   +Guess+N: MAGUS ;

LEXICON GuessNameMAGUS
   +Guess+N+Prop: MAGUS ;

LEXICON GuessLOHAKAS
   +Guess+A: LOHAKAS ;

LEXICON GuessREDEL
   +Guess+N: REDEL ;

LEXICON GuessNameREDEL
   +Guess+N+Prop: REDEL ;

LEXICON GuessTAUD
   +Guess+N: TAUD ;

LEXICON GuessNameTAUD
   +Guess+N+Prop: TAUD ;
   +Guess+N+Prop: FIAT ;   ! ?? no change in orthography

LEXICON GuessRABELEMA
   ma+Guess+V: RABELEMA ;

LEXICON GuessHAKKAMA
   ma+Guess+V: HAKKAMA ;

LEXICON GuessLEPPIMA
   ma+Guess+V: LEPPIMA ;

LEXICON GuessELAMA
   ma+Guess+V: ELAMA ;

LEXICON GuessKOND
   +Guess+N:%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;

LEXICON GuessNameKOND
   +Guess+N+Prop:%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;

LEXICON GuessNameAPO
   +Guess+N+Prop: TAUD ;
   +Guess+N+Prop: REDEL ;   
   +Guess+N+Prop: ARMEE ;   
